Hawaii statutes.
[§327-16] Sale or purchase of body parts
prohibited. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a person
that knowingly, for valuable consideration, purchases or sells a body part for
transplantation or therapy if removal of a body part from an individual is
intended to occur after the individual's death commits a class C felony and
upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $50,000, imprisonment not
exceeding five years, or both.

(b) A person may charge a reasonable amount
for the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage,
transportation, implantation, or disposal of a body part. [L 2008, c 122, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next